Illinois, session 104th, HB4402.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Kidney 5Disease Treatment Delegation Act. 6    Section 2. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to 7safeguard individuals seeking kidney disease treatments in the 8State of Illinois by ensuring that the professionals who 9provide these services are licensed and trained. 10    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:11    "Advanced practice registered nurse" or "APRN" means a 12person who has met the qualifications for a (i) certified 13nurse midwife (CNM); (ii) certified nurse practitioner (CNP); 14(iii) certified registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA); or (iv) 15clinical nurse specialist (CNS) and has been licensed by the 16Department under the Nurse Practice Act.17    "Central venous catheter procedure" includes providing 18dialysis through venous catheters, initiating and terminating 19dialysis through those catheters, connecting and disconnecting 20central venous catheter lines, and maintaining central venous 21catheters through dressing changes and other care.22    "Certified dialysis technician" means a person with an   HB4402- 2 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1accredited high school diploma or State of Illinois High 2School Diploma who has been certified by the Nephrology 3Nursing Certification Commission as a certified clinical 4hemodialysis technician or by the Board of Nephrology 5Examiners Nursing and Technology as a certified hemodialysis 6technologist/technician.7    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 8Professional Regulation.9    "Kidney disease treatment center" has the meaning given to 10that term in subsection (5) of Section 3 of the Illinois Health 11Facilities Planning Act. "Kidney disease treatment center" 12includes a treatment center that provides dialysis through 13venous catheters, initiates and terminates dialysis through 14those catheters, connects and disconnects central venous 15catheter lines, and maintains central venous catheters through 16dressing changes and other care.17    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine 18in all its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.19    "Physician assistant" means a physician assistant licensed 20under the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987.21    "Practical nurse", "licensed practical nurse", or "LPN" 22means a person who is licensed as a practical nurse under the 23Nurse Practice Act and practices practical nursing as defined 24in that Act.25    "Registered nurse", "Registered Professional Nurse", or 26"RN" means a person who is licensed as a professional nurse   HB4402- 3 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1under the Nurse Practice Act and practices nursing as defined 2in that Act. 3    Section 10. Regulation of delegation in kidney disease 4treatment centers. 5    (a) Notwithstanding any provision of the Nurse Practice 6Act or any rule of the Department to the contrary, an 7individual working in a kidney disease treatment center shall 8be considered a licensed individual for the purposes of 9delegation under Section 50-75 of the Nurse Practice Act.10    (b) Notwithstanding any provision of the Nurse Practice 11Act or any rule of the Department to the contrary, delegation 12under this Section, including, but not limited to, delegation 13of the performance of central venous catheter procedures in a 14kidney disease treatment center, shall only be allowed if the 15individual receiving delegation is a licensed practical nurse 16who has obtained the proper training, education, and 17experience or a certified dialysis technician who currently 18holds, or is in the process of acquiring, the necessary 19experience to apply for and obtain one of the following 20certifications:21        (1) certified clinical hemodialysis technician by the 22    Nephrology Nursing Certification Commission; or23        (2) certified hemodialysis technologist/technician by 24    the Board of Nephrology Examiners Nursing and Technology.25    (c) Notwithstanding any provision of the Nurse Practice   HB4402- 4 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1Act or any rule of the Department to the contrary, delegation 2under this Section shall not include medication 3administration, except for the administration of heparin and 4saline for the purposes of performing dialysis treatments and 5flushing lines and the application of topical anesthetics. All 6patient care provided by a licensed practical nurse or a 7certified dialysis technician practicing under this Section 8shall be under the direct and immediate on-site supervision of 9a licensed physician, advanced practice registered nurse, 10physician assistant, or registered nurse. Additionally, the 11following conditions must be present:12        (1) the RN or APRN must complete an assessment of the 13    patient's nursing care needs prior to the delegation;14        (2) the RN or APRN must have either instructed the 15    certified dialysis technician or LPN in the delegated 16    activity or verified the individual's competency to 17    perform the activity; and18        (3) clinical competency of an individual delegated to 19    under this Section shall be documented and available and 20    verified at least annually by the individual's employer. 21    If the delegating party is a physician or physician 22    assistant, the physician or physician assistant shall act 23    in a similar manner as required by the Medical Practice 24    Act of 1987 and the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 25    1987.26    (d) Delegation under this Section shall comply with   HB4402- 5 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1Section 50-75 of the Nurse Practice Act and any rules adopted 2under the Illinois Health Facilities Planning Act, the Nurse 3Practice Act, and any other Illinois statute or rule regarding 4the operation of a kidney disease treatment center as 5described by this Section.6    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to apply to 7any other facility or practice setting. This Section shall not 8be construed as granting a license under the Nurse Practice 9Act and shall not allow individuals receiving delegation under 10this Section to use any title regulated by the Nurse Practice 11Act. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the 12ability of a licensed physician to practice medicine in all 13its branches. 14    Section 15. Rulemaking. The Department is authorized to 15adopt rules for the administration and enforcement of this 16Act. The rules may define standards and criteria for the 17necessary training, education, and experience for licensed 18practical nurses to obtain before receiving delegation under 19this Act.  20    Section 20. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 21Section 70-5 as follows: 22    (225 ILCS 65/70-5)  (was 225 ILCS 65/10-45)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)  HB4402- 6 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1    Sec. 70-5. Grounds for disciplinary action. 2    (a) The Department may refuse to issue or to renew, or may 3revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand, or take other 4disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the Department may 5deem appropriate, including fines not to exceed $10,000 per 6violation, with regard to a license for any one or combination 7of the causes set forth in subsection (b) below. All fines 8collected under this Section shall be deposited in the Nursing 9Dedicated and Professional Fund.10    (b) Grounds for disciplinary action include the following:11        (1) Material deception in furnishing information to 12    the Department.13        (2) Material violations of any provision of this Act 14    or violation of the rules of or final administrative 15    action of the Secretary, after consideration of the 16    recommendation of the Board.17        (3) Conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 18    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or by 19    sentencing of any crime, including, but not limited to, 20    convictions, preceding sentences of supervision, 21    conditional discharge, or first offender probation, under 22    the laws of any jurisdiction of the United States: (i) 23    that is a felony; or (ii) that is a misdemeanor, an 24    essential element of which is dishonesty, or that is 25    directly related to the practice of the profession.26        (4) A pattern of practice or other behavior which   HB4402- 7 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1    demonstrates incapacity or incompetency to practice under 2    this Act.3        (5) Knowingly aiding or assisting another person in 4    violating any provision of this Act or rules.5        (6) Failing, within 90 days, to provide a response to 6    a request for information in response to a written request 7    made by the Department by certified or registered mail or 8    by email to the email address of record.9        (7) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 10    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 11    defraud, or harm the public, as defined by rule.12        (8) Unlawful taking, theft, selling, distributing, or 13    manufacturing of any drug, narcotic, or prescription 14    device.15        (9) Habitual or excessive use or addiction to alcohol, 16    narcotics, stimulants, or any other chemical agent or drug 17    that could result in a licensee's inability to practice 18    with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety.19        (10) Discipline by another U.S. jurisdiction or 20    foreign nation, if at least one of the grounds for the 21    discipline is the same or substantially equivalent to 22    those set forth in this Section.23        (11) A finding that the licensee, after having her or 24    his license placed on probationary status or subject to 25    conditions or restrictions, has violated the terms of 26    probation or failed to comply with such terms or   HB4402- 8 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1    conditions.2        (12) Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 3    report by the Department of Children and Family Services 4    and under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, 5    and upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the 6    licensee has caused a child to be an abused child or 7    neglected child as defined in the Abused and Neglected 8    Child Reporting Act.9        (13) Willful omission to file or record, or willfully 10    impeding the filing or recording or inducing another 11    person to omit to file or record medical reports as 12    required by law. 13        (13.5) Willfully failing to report an instance of 14    suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the Abused 15    and Neglected Child Reporting Act.16        (14) Gross negligence in the practice of practical, 17    professional, or advanced practice registered nursing.18        (15) Holding oneself out to be practicing nursing 19    under any name other than one's own.20        (16) Failure of a licensee to report to the Department 21    any adverse final action taken against him or her by 22    another licensing jurisdiction of the United States or any 23    foreign state or country, any peer review body, any health 24    care institution, any professional or nursing society or 25    association, any governmental agency, any law enforcement 26    agency, or any court or a nursing liability claim related   HB4402- 9 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1    to acts or conduct similar to acts or conduct that would 2    constitute grounds for action as defined in this Section.3        (17) Failure of a licensee to report to the Department 4    surrender by the licensee of a license or authorization to 5    practice nursing or advanced practice registered nursing 6    in another state or jurisdiction or current surrender by 7    the licensee of membership on any nursing staff or in any 8    nursing or advanced practice registered nursing or 9    professional association or society while under 10    disciplinary investigation by any of those authorities or 11    bodies for acts or conduct similar to acts or conduct that 12    would constitute grounds for action as defined by this 13    Section.14        (18) Failing, within 60 days, to provide information 15    in response to a written request made by the Department.16        (19) Failure to establish and maintain records of 17    patient care and treatment as required by law.18        (20) Fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in applying 19    for or procuring a license under this Act or in connection 20    with applying for renewal of a license under this Act.21        (21) Allowing another person or organization to use 22    the licensee's license to deceive the public.23        (22) Willfully making or filing false records or 24    reports in the licensee's practice, including, but not 25    limited to, false records to support claims against the 26    medical assistance program of the Department of Healthcare   HB4402- 10 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1    and Family Services (formerly Department of Public Aid) 2    under the Illinois Public Aid Code.3        (23) Attempting to subvert or cheat on a licensing 4    examination administered under this Act.5        (24) Immoral conduct in the commission of an act, 6    including, but not limited to, sexual abuse, sexual 7    misconduct, or sexual exploitation, related to the 8    licensee's practice.9        (25) Willfully or negligently violating the 10    confidentiality between nurse and patient except as 11    required by law.12        (26) Practicing under a false or assumed name, except 13    as provided by law.14        (27) The use of any false, fraudulent, or deceptive 15    statement in any document connected with the licensee's 16    practice.17        (28) Directly or indirectly giving to or receiving 18    from a person, firm, corporation, partnership, or 19    association a fee, commission, rebate, or other form of 20    compensation for professional services not actually or 21    personally rendered. Nothing in this paragraph (28) 22    affects any bona fide independent contractor or employment 23    arrangements among health care professionals, health 24    facilities, health care providers, or other entities, 25    except as otherwise prohibited by law. Any employment 26    arrangements may include provisions for compensation,   HB4402- 11 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1    health insurance, pension, or other employment benefits 2    for the provision of services within the scope of the 3    licensee's practice under this Act. Nothing in this 4    paragraph (28) shall be construed to require an employment 5    arrangement to receive professional fees for services 6    rendered. 7        (29) A violation of the Health Care Worker 8    Self-Referral Act.9        (30) Physical illness, mental illness, or disability 10    that results in the inability to practice the profession 11    with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety.12        (31) Exceeding the terms of a collaborative agreement 13    or the prescriptive authority delegated to a licensee by 14    his or her collaborating physician or podiatric physician 15    in guidelines established under a written collaborative 16    agreement.17        (32) Making a false or misleading statement regarding 18    a licensee's skill or the efficacy or value of the 19    medicine, treatment, or remedy prescribed by him or her in 20    the course of treatment.21        (33) Prescribing, selling, administering, 22    distributing, giving, or self-administering a drug 23    classified as a controlled substance (designated product) 24    or narcotic for other than medically accepted therapeutic 25    purposes.26        (34) Promotion of the sale of drugs, devices,   HB4402- 12 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1    appliances, or goods provided for a patient in a manner to 2    exploit the patient for financial gain.3        (35) Violating State or federal laws, rules, or 4    regulations relating to controlled substances.5        (36) Willfully or negligently violating the 6    confidentiality between an advanced practice registered 7    nurse, collaborating physician, dentist, or podiatric 8    physician and a patient, except as required by law.9        (37) Willfully failing to report an instance of 10    suspected abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or 11    self-neglect of an eligible adult as defined in and 12    required by the Adult Protective Services Act.13        (38) Being named as an abuser in a verified report by 14    the Department on Aging and under the Adult Protective 15    Services Act, and upon proof by clear and convincing 16    evidence that the licensee abused, neglected, or 17    financially exploited an eligible adult as defined in the 18    Adult Protective Services Act. 19        (39) A violation of any provision of this Act or any 20    rules adopted under this Act.21        (40) Violating the Compassionate Use of Medical 22    Cannabis Program Act. 23        (41) Violating the Kidney Disease Treatment Delegation 24    Act. 25    (b-5) The Department shall not revoke, suspend, summarily 26suspend, place on probation, reprimand, refuse to issue or   HB4402- 13 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1renew, or take any other disciplinary or non-disciplinary 2action against a person's authorization to practice under this 3Act based solely upon the person providing, authorizing, 4recommending, aiding, assisting, referring for, or otherwise 5participating in any health care service, so long as the care 6was not unlawful under the laws of this State, regardless of 7whether the patient was a resident of this State or another 8state.9    (b-10) The Department shall not revoke, suspend, summarily 10suspend, place on prohibition, reprimand, refuse to issue or 11renew, or take any other disciplinary or non-disciplinary 12action against a person's authorization to practice under this 13Act based upon the person's license, registration, or permit 14being revoked or suspended, or the person being otherwise 15disciplined, by any other state if that revocation, 16suspension, or other form of discipline was based solely on 17the person violating another state's laws prohibiting the 18provision of, authorization of, recommendation of, aiding or 19assisting in, referring for, or participation in any health 20care service if that health care service as provided would not 21have been unlawful under the laws of this State and is 22consistent with the applicable standard of conduct for the 23person practicing in Illinois under this Act.24    (b-15) The conduct specified in subsections (b-5) and 25(b-10) shall not trigger reporting requirements under Section 2665-65 or constitute grounds for suspension under Section   HB4402- 14 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b170-60.2    (b-20) An applicant seeking licensure, certification, or 3authorization under this Act who has been subject to 4disciplinary action by a duly authorized professional 5disciplinary agency of another jurisdiction solely on the 6basis of having provided, authorized, recommended, aided, 7assisted, referred for, or otherwise participated in health 8care shall not be denied such licensure, certification, or 9authorization, unless the Department determines that such 10action would have constituted professional misconduct in this 11State; however, nothing in this Section shall be construed as 12prohibiting the Department from evaluating the conduct of such 13applicant and making a determination regarding the licensure, 14certification, or authorization to practice a profession under 15this Act. 16    (c) The determination by a circuit court that a licensee 17is subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission as 18provided in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 19Code, as amended, operates as an automatic suspension. The 20suspension will end only upon a finding by a court that the 21patient is no longer subject to involuntary admission or 22judicial admission and issues an order so finding and 23discharging the patient; and upon the recommendation of the 24Board to the Secretary that the licensee be allowed to resume 25his or her practice.26    (d) The Department may refuse to issue or may suspend or   HB4402- 15 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1otherwise discipline the license of any person who fails to 2file a return, or to pay the tax, penalty, or interest shown in 3a filed return, or to pay any final assessment of the tax, 4penalty, or interest as required by any tax Act administered 5by the Department of Revenue, until such time as the 6requirements of any such tax Act are satisfied.7    (e) In enforcing this Act, the Department, upon a showing 8of a possible violation, may compel an individual licensed to 9practice under this Act or who has applied for licensure under 10this Act, to submit to a mental or physical examination, or 11both, as required by and at the expense of the Department. The 12Department may order the examining physician to present 13testimony concerning the mental or physical examination of the 14licensee or applicant. No information shall be excluded by 15reason of any common law or statutory privilege relating to 16communications between the licensee or applicant and the 17examining physician. The examining physicians shall be 18specifically designated by the Department. The individual to 19be examined may have, at his or her own expense, another 20physician of his or her choice present during all aspects of 21this examination. Failure of an individual to submit to a 22mental or physical examination, when directed, shall result in 23an automatic suspension without hearing.24    All substance-related violations shall mandate an 25automatic substance abuse assessment. Failure to submit to an 26assessment by a licensed physician who is certified as an   HB4402- 16 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1addictionist or an advanced practice registered nurse with 2specialty certification in addictions may be grounds for an 3automatic suspension, as defined by rule. 4    If the Department finds an individual unable to practice 5or unfit for duty because of the reasons set forth in this 6subsection (e), the Department may require that individual to 7submit to a substance abuse evaluation or treatment by 8individuals or programs approved or designated by the 9Department, as a condition, term, or restriction for 10continued, restored, or renewed licensure to practice; or, in 11lieu of evaluation or treatment, the Department may file, or 12the Board may recommend to the Department to file, a complaint 13to immediately suspend, revoke, or otherwise discipline the 14license of the individual. An individual whose license was 15granted, continued, restored, renewed, disciplined, or 16supervised subject to such terms, conditions, or restrictions, 17and who fails to comply with such terms, conditions, or 18restrictions, shall be referred to the Secretary for a 19determination as to whether the individual shall have his or 20her license suspended immediately, pending a hearing by the 21Department.22    In instances in which the Secretary immediately suspends a 23person's license under this subsection (e), a hearing on that 24person's license must be convened by the Department within 15 25days after the suspension and completed without appreciable 26delay. The Department and Board shall have the authority to   HB4402- 17 -LRB104 18157 BAB 31596 b1review the subject individual's record of treatment and 2counseling regarding the impairment to the extent permitted by 3applicable federal statutes and regulations safeguarding the 4confidentiality of medical records.5    An individual licensed under this Act and affected under 6this subsection (e) shall be afforded an opportunity to 7demonstrate to the Department that he or she can resume 8practice in compliance with nursing standards under the 9provisions of his or her license.10    (f) The Department may adopt rules to implement, 11administer, and enforce this Section. 12(Source: P.A. 104-432, eff. 1-1-26.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.